Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.09.040

Articles of entity conversion.

(1) After a plan of entity conversion by a domestic corporation converting into an other entity has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of entity conversion must be executed on behalf of the domestic corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative and must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(2) After the conversion of an other entity into a domestic corporation has been adopted and approved as required by the organic law of the converting entity, articles of entity conversion must be executed on behalf of the converting entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative and must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

(3) The articles of entity conversion must set forth:

(a) A statement that the converting entity has been converted into the surviving entity;

(b) The name and form of the converting entity before conversion;

(c) The name and form of the surviving entity after conversion, which must be a name that satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW if the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;

(d) Articles of incorporation that comply with RCW 23B.02.020 if the surviving entity after conversion is a domestic corporation;

(e) The date the conversion is effective under the organic law of the surviving entity;

(f) If the converting entity is a domestic corporation, a statement that the conversion was duly approved by the shareholders of the domestic corporation pursuant to RCW 23B.09.030;

(g) If the converting entity is an other entity, a statement that the conversion was duly approved as required by the organic law of the converting entity; and

(h) If the surviving entity is a foreign other entity not authorized to transact business in this state: (i) A statement that the surviving entity consents to service of process pursuant to RCW 23.95.450 in a proceeding to enforce any obligation or the rights of dissenting shareholders of the domestic corporation; and (ii) the street and mailing address of the entity's principal office that may be used for service of process under RCW 23.95.450.

(4) The articles of entity conversion take effect at the effective time provided in RCW 23.95.210. Articles of entity conversion under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be combined with any required conversion filing under the organic law of the other entity if the combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the organic law of the other entity.

[ 2020 c 57 s 66; 2015 c 176 s 2121; 2014 c 83 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.